Illinois, session 104th, SB3372.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 12-4.60 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/12-4.60 new)7    Sec. 12-4.60. SNAP smart chip-enabled EBT cards. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "SNAP" means the federal 9Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.10    (b) To reduce the risk of SNAP recipients becoming the 11victims of benefits fraud by means of card skimming, card 12cloning, or some other similar fraudulent method, the 13Department of Human Services shall transition to and issue as 14soon as practicable electronic benefits transfer (EBT) cards 15embedded with a smart chip or Near Field Communication 16technology that enables cardholders to make a payment 17transaction by either inserting an EBT card into a card reader 18or by "tapping" an EBT card onto a payment terminal or card 19reader that is enabled to accept and process contactless 20payments.